th: ขนาดกระดาษ: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 มม. x 210 มม.; 176 มม. x 250 มม.; 18" x 24"; 210 มม. x 297 มม; 24" x 36"; 297 มม. x 420 มม.; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; ขนาดที่กำหนดเอง; DL; ซองจดหมาย; ขนาด Executive; ขนาด Legal; จดหมาย; รูปถ่าย; โปสการ์ด; แท็บลอยด์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 纸张尺寸: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 毫米 x 210 毫米; 176 毫米 x 250 毫米; 18" x 24"; 210 毫米 x 297 毫米; 24" x 36"; 297 毫米 x 420 毫米; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; 定制尺寸; DL; 信封; Executive; 法律专用纸; 信纸; 照片; 明信片; Tabloid; 其他
nl: Papierformaat: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Aangepast formaat; DL; Envelop; Executive; Legal; Letter; Foto; Briefkaart; Tabloid; Andere
el: Μέγεθος χαρτιού: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Προσαρμοσμένο μέγεθος; DL; Φάκελος; Executive; Legal; Γράμμα; Φωτογραφία; Postcard; Σκανδαλοθηρικά θέματα; Άλλο
vi: Khổ giấy: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Khổ tùy chỉnh; DL; Envelope; Executive; Legal; Letter; Ảnh; Bưu thiếp; Tabloid; Khác
cs: Formát papíru: 10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Vlastní velikost; DL; Obálka; Executive; Legal; Letter; Fotografie; Pohlednice; Tabloid; Jiné
pt-PT: Tamanho do papel: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Tamanho personalizado; DL; Envelope; Executivo; Legal; Carta; Foto; Postal; Tabloide; Outro
pt-BR: Tamanho do papel: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Tamanho personalizado; DL; Envelope; Executivo; Jurídico; Carta; Foto; Cartão postal; Tabloide; Outro
ja: 用紙サイズ: #10; 11 x 14インチ; 11 x 17インチ; 12 x 12インチ; 12 x 18インチ; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18 x 24インチ; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24 x 36インチ; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4 x 6インチ; 5 x 7インチ; 6 x 6インチ; 7.25 x 10.5インチ; 8 x 10インチ; 8.5 x 11インチ; 8.5 x 14インチ; 9 x 12インチ; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; カスタムサイズ; DL; 封筒; エグゼクティブ; リーガル; レター; 写真; ポストカード; タブロイド; その他
sv: Pappersstorlek: #10; 11 x 14 tum; 11 x 17 tum; 12 x 12 tum; 12 x 18; 148 x 210 mm; 176 x 250 mm; 18 x 24 tum; 210 x 297 mm; 24 x 36 tum; 297 x 420 mm; 4 x 6 tum; 5 x 7 tum; 6 x 6 tum; 7,25 x 10,5 tum; 8 x 10 tum; 8,5 x 11 tum; 8,5 x 14 tum; 9 x 12 tum; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Anpassad storlek; DL; Kuvert; Verkställande; Juridisk; Brev; Foto; Vykort; Tabloid; Annat
da: Papirstørrelse: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Brugerdefineret størrelse; DL; Kuvert; Executive; Juridisk; Brev; Foto; Postkort; Tabloid; Andet
tr: Kağıt Boyutu: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Özel boyut; DL; Zarf; Yönetici; Hukuki; Mektup; Fotoğraf; Kartpostal; Tabloit gazete; Diğer
fr: Format du papier: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Format personnalisé; DL; Enveloppe; Exécutif; Légal; Lettre; Photo; Carte postale; Tabloïde; Autre
fi: Paperin koko: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25 x 10,5 tuumaa; 8" x 10"; 8,5 x 11 tuumaa; 8,5 x 14 tuumaa; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Mittatilauskoko; DL; Kirjekuori; Toimisto; Lakimateriaali; Kirje; Kuva; Postikortti; Tabloid; Muu
es: Tamaño de papel: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Tamaño personalizado; DL; Sobre; Ejecutivo; Legal; Carta; Foto; Tarjeta postal; Tabloide; Otros
ko: 용지 크기: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148mm x 210mm; 176mm x 250mm; 18" x 24"; 210mm x 297mm; 24" x 36"; 297mm x 420mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; 사용자 지정 크기; DL; 엔벨로프; 익스큐티브; 리걸; 레터; 사진; 엽서; 타블로이드; 기타
lt-LT: Popieriaus dydis: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Pasirinktinis dydis; DL; „Envelope“; „Executive“; „Legal“; „Letter“; Nuotrauka; Atvirukas; „Tabloid“; Kita
zh-TW: 紙張尺寸: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; 自訂大小; DL; 信封; Executive; Legal; Letter; 照片; 明信片; 小報; 其他
bg-BG: Размер на хартията: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Персонализиран размер; DL; Плик; Executive; Legal; Letter; Снимка; Пощенска картичка; Таблоид; Други
ro-RO: Dimensiunea hârtiei: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Dimensiune personalizată; DL; Plic; Executive; Juridic; Scrisoare; Fotografie; Carte poștală; Tabloid; Altele
hu: Papír mérete: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Egyedi méret; DL; Envelope; Executive; Legal; Letter; Photo; Postcard; Tabloid; Egyéb
nb: Papirstørrelse: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Tilpasset størrelse; DL; Konvolutt; Executive; Legal; Brev; Foto; Postkort; Tabloid; Annen
en: Paper size: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8.5" x 11"; 8.5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Custom size; DL; Envelope; Executive; Legal; Letter; Photo; Postcard; Tabloid; Other
it: Formato della carta: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Formato personalizzato; DL; Busta; Executive; Legale; Lettera; Fotografia; Cartolina; Tabloid; Altro
sk-SK: Veľkosť papiera: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Vlastná veľkosť; DL; Obálka; Výkonný; Právny; List; Fotografia; Pohľadnica; Bulvárny časopis; Iné
ru: Размер бумаги: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 х 210 мм; 176 х 250 мм; 18" x 24"; 210 х 297 мм; 24" x 36"; 297 х 420 мм; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Пользовательский размер; DL; Конверт; Executive; Legal; Letter; Фото; Открытка; Tabloid; Другой
pl: Rozmiar papieru: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Własny rozmiar; DD; Koperta; Executive; Legal; Letter; Zdjęcie; Kartka pocztowa; Tabloid; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Veličina papira: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Prilagođena veličina; DL; Omotnica; Izvršni; Pravni; Pismo; Fotografija; Razglednica; Tabloid; Ostalo
de: Papierformat: #10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7,25" x 10,5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Benutzerdefiniertes Format; DL; Umschlag; Executive; Legal; Letter; Foto; Postkarte; Tabloid; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Velikost papirja: Št. 10; 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 12" x 12"; 12" x 18"; 148 mm x 210 mm; 176 mm x 250 mm; 18" x 24"; 210 mm x 297 mm; 24" x 36"; 297 mm x 420 mm; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 6" x 6"; 7.25" x 10.5"; 8" x 10"; 8,5" x 11"; 8,5" x 14"; 9" x 12"; A1; A2; A3; A4; A5; A6; A7; B5; C5; Velikost po meri; DL; Ovojnica; Poslovni A4; Daljši A4; A4; Fotografija; Razglednica; A3; Drugo